Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1108
Order; alternate payee; file with board; notice.

The alternate payee shall file a copy of the domestic relations order involving benefits under a statewide public retirement system with the Public Employees Retirement Board within ninety days after the date that the order was entered. Upon good cause shown, the board may accept an order after ninety days following its entry. Within ten days, the board shall notify in writing the member and alternate payee that the board has received the domestic relations order. Such notice shall include a description of the procedure to determine if the domestic relations order is a qualified domestic relations order under the Spousal Pension Rights Act. The Public Employees Retirement Board shall be held harmless by the alternate payee and the member for any amounts paid in violation of an order prior to the date on which the order is filed with the board.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 8;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 41.